Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-510
Membership on board; qualifications.

Membership on the board shall consist of four professional members and one public member appointed pursuant to section 38-158. The members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. Two of the professional members shall be audiologists, and two of the professional members shall be speech-language pathologists.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 195.